Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-498
Raptors; take or maintain; permit required.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to take or attempt to take or maintain a raptor in captivity, except as otherwise provided by law or by rule or regulation of the commission, unless he or she possesses a raptor permit for falconry, a raptor permit for wildlife abatement, a captive propagation permit, or a raptor collecting permit as required by section 37-497.

(2) No person shall sell, barter, purchase, or offer to sell, barter, or purchase any raptor, raptor egg, or raptor semen, except as permitted under a raptor permit for falconry, a raptor permit for wildlife abatement, or a captive propagation permit issued under section 37-497 or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any sale, barter, purchase, or offer to sell, barter, or purchase any raptor, raptor egg, or raptor semen taken from the wild.

Laws 1971, LB 733, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 154, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-721;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 208;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 24;

Laws 2019, LB374, § 5.